src/fst/affixes/kawe-verb-pron-pref.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------


LEXICON PronomPrefix
Active+:0   RedPrefixes   ; !! red prefixes 
Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+:0   RedPerfectPrefixes   ; !! red turn blue prefixes in Perfective aspect
Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+:0 BluePrefixes  ; !! blue prefixes
Transitive+:0    PurplePrefixes   ; !! purple prefixes

LEXICON RedPrefixes
@U.VerbType.Red@    ActivePronoun;

LEXICON RedPerfectPrefixes 
@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@    PassivePronoun;

LEXICON BluePrefixes
@U.VerbType.Blue@    PassivePronoun;

LEXICON PurplePrefixes
@U.VerbType.Purple@    TransitivePronoun;



LEXICON ActivePronoun
<0:ppStart> BoundPronounActive ;

LEXICON PassivePronoun
<0:ppStart> BoundPronounPassive ;

LEXICON TransitivePronoun
<0:ppStart> BoundPronounRelation ;




!!------------------ ACTIVE VERBS (RED PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounActive
AgentSg1+:ke EndActive   ;
<AgentSg2%+:{se} "@P.Command.On@" > EndActive   ;
AgentSg3Mal+:ra EndActive   ;
AgentSg3Fem+:ye EndActive   ;
AgentSg3Neuter+:ka EndActive   ;
AgentDu21+:teni EndActive   ;
AgentDu31+:yakeni EndActive   ;
<AgentDu2%+:{seni} "@P.Command.On@"> EndActive   ;
<AgentDu3%+:[hiddenH {ni} ]> EndActive    ;
AgentDu3Fem+:keni EndActive   ;
AgentPl2Sg1+:tewa EndActive   ;
AgentPl3Sg1+:yakwa EndActive   ;
<AgentPl2%+:{sewa} "@P.Command.On@" > EndActive   ;
AgentPl3+:rati EndActive   ;
AgentPl3Fem+:konti EndActive   ;

LEXICON EndActive
PatSg3Neuter+:0 VerbStem   ; !! put a neutral patient for all active verbs

!!------------------ PASSIVE VERBS (BLUE PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounPassive
PatSg1+:wake EndPassive   ;
<PatSg2%+:{sa} "@P.Command.On@"> EndPassive   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ro EndPassive   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yako EndPassive   ;
PatSg3Neuter+:yo EndPassive   ; 
PatDu21+:yonkeni EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkeni EndPassive   ; 
<PatDu2%+:{seni} "@P.Command.On@"> EndPassive   ; 
PatDu3+:roti EndPassive   ;
PatDu3Fem+:yoti EndPassive   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkwa EndPassive   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkwa EndPassive   ;
<PatPl2%+:{sewa} "@P.Command.On@"> EndPassive   ;
PatPl3+:roti EndPassive   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yoti EndPassive   ;

LEXICON EndPassive
VerbStem   ; 

!!------------------ RELATION OR TRANSITIVE VERBS (PURPLE PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounRelation
AgentSg1+:0 RelationPronI   ;
<AgentSg2%+:0 "@P.Command.On@"> RelationPronYou   ;
AgentSg3Mal+:0 RelationPronHe   ;
AgentSg3Fem+:0 RelationPronShe   ;
<AgentDu21%+:0 "@P.Command.On@"> RelationPronYouI   ;
AgentDu31+:0 RelationPronSmbI   ;
<AgentDu2%+:0 "@P.Command.On@"> RelationPronYou2   ;
AgentDu3+:0 Relation2Ms   ;
AgentDu3Fem+:0 Relation2Fs   ;
<AgentPl2Sg1%+:0 "@P.Command.On@"> RelationYouAllI   ;
AgentPl3Sg1+:0 RelationTheyAllI ;
<AgentPl2%+:0 "@P.Command.On@"> RelationYouAll   ;
AgentPl3+:0 RelationTheyMs   ;
AgentPl3Fem+:0 RelationTheyFs   ;

LEXICON RelationPronI
PatSg2+:kon EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ri EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:khe EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:keni EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:khe EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:khe EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:khe EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:khe EndRelation   ;


LEXICON RelationPronYou
PatSg1+:take EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:etshe EndRelation   ;
<PatSg3Fem%+:[hiddenH {she} ]> EndRelation    ;
PatDu31+:takeni EndRelation   ;
<PatDu3%+:[hiddenH {she} ]> EndRelation    ;
<PatDu3Fem%+:[hiddenH {she} ]> EndRelation    ;
PatPl3Sg1+:takwa EndRelation   ;
<PatPl3%+:[hiddenH {she} ]> EndRelation    ;
<PatPl3Fem%+:[hiddenH {she} ]> EndRelation    ;

LEXICON RelationPronHe
PatSg1+:rake EndRelation   ;
<PatSg2%+:[hiddenH {ya} ]> EndRelation    ;
PatSg3Mal+:ro EndRelation   ;
<PatSg3Fem%+:[hiddenH {shako} ]> EndRelation    ;
<PatDu21%+:[hiddenH {shonkeni} ]> EndRelation    ;
<PatDu31%+:[hiddenH {shonkeni} ]> EndRelation    ;
PatDu2+:etshiseni EndRelation   ;
<PatDu3%+:[hiddenH {shako} ]> EndRelation    ;
<PatDu3Fem%+:[hiddenH {shako} ]> EndRelation    ;
<PatPl2Sg1%+:[hiddenH {shonkwa} ]> EndRelation    ;
<PatPl3Sg1%+:[hiddenH {shonkwa} ]> EndRelation    ;
PatPl2+:etshisewa EndRelation   ;
<PatPl3%+:[hiddenH {shako} ]> EndRelation    ;
<PatPl3Fem%+:[hiddenH {shako} ]> EndRelation    ;

LEXICON RelationPronShe
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yontate EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Neuter+:konwa EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:ronwati EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:konwati EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:ronwati EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:konwati EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationPronYouI
PatSg3Mal+:etshiteni EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationPronSmbI
PatSg2+:keni EndRelation   ;
<PatSg3Mal%+:[hiddenH {shakeni} ]> EndRelation    ;
PatSg3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationPronYou2
PatSg1+:takeni EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:etshiseni EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatDu31+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON Relation2Ms
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:shakoti EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:ronwati EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:konwati EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:ronwati EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:konwati EndRelation   ;

LEXICON Relation2Fs
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yakoti EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:ronwati EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:konwati EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:ronwati EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:konwati EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationYouAllI
PatSg3Mal+:etshitewa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yethi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yethi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationTheyAllI
PatSg2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
<PatSg3Mal%+:[hiddenH {shakwa} ]> EndRelation    ;
PatSg3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:kwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yakhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yakhi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationYouAll
PatSg1+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:etshisewa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatDu31+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatDu3+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatDu3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:takwa EndRelation   ;
PatPl3+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yetshi EndRelation   ;

LEXICON RelationTheyMs  
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
<PatSg3Fem%+:[hiddenH {shakoti} ]> EndRelation    ;
PatSg3Fem+:konwa EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;


LEXICON RelationTheyFs  
PatSg1+:yonke EndRelation   ;
PatSg2+:yesa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ronwa EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yakoti EndRelation   ;
PatDu21+:yonkhi EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatDu2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkhi EndRelation   ;
PatPl2+:yetshi EndRelation   ;


LEXICON EndRelation
VerbStem   ; 
